Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 4. Employee Benefits
§ 27-14-404.
Temporary total disability; benefits; determination of eligibility; exceptions for volunteers or prisoners; period of certification limited; temporary light duty employment.

If after a compensable injury is sustained and as a result of the injury the employee is subject to temporary total disability as defined under W.S. 27-14-102(a)(xviii), the injured employee is entitled to receive a temporary total disability award for the period of temporary total disability as provided by W.S. 27-14-403(c). The period for receiving a temporary total disability award under this section for injuries resulting from any one (1) incident or accident shall not exceed a cumulative period of twenty-four (24) months, except that the division pursuant to its rules and regulations and in its discretion may in the event of extraordinary circumstances award additional temporary total disability benefits. The division’s decision to grant such additional benefits shall be reviewable by a hearing examiner only for an abuse of discretion by the division.

Any employee awarded benefits under W.S.

27-14-405

or

27-14-406

is not eligible for benefits under subsection (a) of this section unless the employee has returned to gainful employment and following employment, undergoes additional surgery not reasonably contemplated before the award for permanent impairment or disability and then only for a reasonable period of recuperation, confinement for medical care during the actual period of confinement or unless application is made and an award is granted under W.S.

27-14-605

.

Payment under subsection (a) of this section shall cease prior to expiration of the twenty-four (24) month maximum period specified under subsection (a) of this section if:

Recovery is complete to the extent that the earning power of the employee at a gainful occupation for which he is reasonably suited by experience or training is substantially restored; or

The employee has an ascertainable loss, qualifies for benefits under W.S.

27-14-405

or

27-14-406

and the first monthly payment pursuant to either of those sections has been issued to the employee.

Disability payments under this section shall not be allowed for the first three (3) days of disability unless the incapacity extends beyond eight (8) days. If payments cease for a period of eight (8) days or more, the employee may apply for reinstatement under W.S.

27-14-605

and any award granted shall be treated as an initial award. In determining the period of disability, the day the disability occurred shall be included unless the employee received full payment of wages for that day. No employee shall be forced to use sick leave before applying for or instead of benefits under this section. Benefits under subsection (a) of this section shall not be paid if:

An employee or his personal representative fails to file a claim for benefits within thirty (30) days after the first day immediately succeeding the first thirty (30) days of any certified period of temporary total disability;

A claim is filed without the signature of the claimant and certification by the attending health care provider; or

An employee is receiving unemployment compensation under W.S.

27-3-101

through

27-3-704

.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, any volunteer or mine rescue team member covered under this act and sustaining a temporary total disability in the line of duty shall receive the maximum benefit allowable under this section.

Any individual serving time in any penal or correctional institution who is an employee under this act or any probationer or parolee not covered by a qualifying employer-employee relationship performing work pursuant to court order is not eligible for benefits under this section for injuries suffered during the period of incarceration, probation or parole. Upon release from the penal or correctional institution or upon completion of probation or parole, any remaining benefits for which the individual would otherwise qualify for under this section shall be paid from and after the date of release or completion. In addition, any individual classified as a school-to-work participant under this act is not eligible for benefits under this section for injuries suffered during the participation in a school-to-work program activity.

Only a health care provider may certify temporary total disability under this act. The length of time of the initial certification or recertification of temporary total disability shall be established by the department after considering the recommendation of the health care provider and current medical literature. Subject to W.S.

27-14-609

, the employer, employee or division may request recertification of the period of temporary total disability at intervals of not less than sixty (60) days, provided that in the event of extraordinary circumstances, the division may reconsider recertification at any time. The temporary total disability shall not exceed the period allowed by W.S. 27-14-404(a).

Payment under subsection (a) of this section shall be suspended if the injured employee fails to appear at an appointment with his health care provider. Payment shall be suspended under this subsection until such time as the employee appears at a subsequent rescheduled appointment. Payment shall not be suspended for failing to appear at an appointment if the employee notifies the case manager or the division prior to the appointment or within twenty-four (24) hours after missing the appointment and the division determines, after recommendation by the case manager, that the employee made all reasonable efforts to appear at the appointment. At the time of the first benefit payment under this section, the division shall notify the employee of the requirements and other provisions of this subsection, including the procedures to be followed in notifying the case manager or the division. For purposes of this subsection, health care provider includes physical and occupational therapists.

An employer may make a written offer of temporary light duty work to an employee receiving temporary total disability under subsection (a) of this section. The offer shall be a bona fide offer on a form supplied by the division, stating with specificity the proposed hours of employment, starting date, wage and physical or other functional capacity requirements of the light duty work. If the employee accepts the offer, the temporary total disability award shall cease and the employee shall receive a temporary light duty award, subject to the following terms and conditions:

After notice to the employer, the health care provider who certified temporary total disability has certified on the light duty work agreement that the employee is released to perform the light duty work described in the agreement;

All periods of light duty work may not exceed one (1) year cumulatively for any one (1) injury;

The temporary light duty assignment commences not less than fourteen (14) days following the written offer;

Payment of the temporary light duty award shall cease as provided for temporary total disability under subsection (c) of this section or if the employee’s actual monthly earnings from all sources when combined with the temporary light duty award exceed ninety-five percent (95%) of the employee’s actual monthly earnings at the time of injury;

The employer shall provide the division before commencement of the light duty work with a copy of the light duty work agreement signed by the employer and the employee, and shall report to the division by the fifteenth of each month the employee’s hours and rate of pay for the previous month;

The temporary total disability award of any employee refusing a bona fide written offer of temporary light duty work pursuant to this subsection shall be reduced by two-thirds (2/3) unless the employee provides written proof to the employer and the division of enrollment by the employee in any collegiate, vocational retraining, general education development or other program approved by the division which is designed to retrain the employee for employment in an occupation other than that previously offered by the employer; and

The temporary light duty award under this subsection and the balance of a temporary total disability award under paragraph (vi) of this subsection shall not be charged to the employer’s experience rating established under W.S. 27-14-201(d).

If the employer objects to a division determination that an injury is compensable and the employee’s health care provider has certified the employee as temporarily totally disabled, an injured worker may request an interim benefit while his case is under appeal. The amount of the benefit will be calculated at the temporary total disability rate as determined under W.S. 27-14-403(c) and shall be paid for up to three (3) months until a final compensability decision by a hearing examiner is issued or until the expiration of the period of certified temporary disability, whichever occurs first. The period during which the interim benefit is received shall be included in the time period allowed under W.S. 27-14-404(a). The experience rating of the employer against whom a claim is made shall not be charged for the interim benefit if the injury is determined after hearing not to be compensable. Only one (1) interim benefit under this subsection may be awarded per injury.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1989, ch. 161, § 1; ch. 226, § 1; ch. 264, § 2; 1993, ch. 205, § 1; ch. 216, § 1; 1994, ch. 86, § 2; 1995, ch. 100, § 1; 1996, ch. 82, § 1; 2000, ch. 98, § 1; 2004, ch. 13, § 1; 2009, ch. 156, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, rewrote (j), amending temporary light duty awards and requirements.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (c)(ii), added “and the first monthly payment pursuant to either of those sections has been issued to the employee” at the end.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Maximum medical improvement.—

Medical Commission did not err by using the definition of maximum medical improvement (MMI) in the AMA Guides to Evaluation of Permanent Impairment because the AMA Guides definition of MMI was consistent with Wyoming law. Morris v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs. (In re Worker's Comp. Claim), 2017 WY 119, 403 P.3d 980,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 2017).

Benefits cease when stability or recovery reached.—

Medical Commission's determination that an employee's temporary total disability (TTD) benefits were properly terminated on the ground that she reached maximum medical improvement (MMI) was supported by substantial evidence because it properly accepted the conclusion of the Division's experts; the Commission properly rejected the testimony of the employee's surgeon because the surgeon misunderstood, or did not agree with, the meanings of MMI, ascertainable loss, and TTD under Wyoming law. Morris v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs. (In re Worker's Comp. Claim), 2017 WY 119, 403 P.3d 980,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 2017).

Termination of temporary total disability benefits.—

Medical Commission's determination that an employee's temporary total disability (TTD) benefits were properly terminated on the ground that she reached maximum medical improvement (MMI) was supported by substantial evidence because it properly accepted the conclusion of the Division's experts; the Commission properly rejected the testimony of the employee's surgeon because the surgeon misunderstood, or did not agree with, the meanings of MMI, ascertainable loss, and TTD under Wyoming law. Morris v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs. (In re Worker's Comp. Claim), 2017 WY 119, 403 P.3d 980,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 2017).

Applicability. —

Office of administrative hearings incorrectly ruled that the claimant's request for modification of temporary total disability benefits due to increased incapacity was governed by this section, requiring proof of additional surgery, and not § 27-14-605(a). Osenbaugh v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 10 P.3d 544,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 2000).

The procedural requirements of subsection (d)

do not apply during the pendency of a contested case, and the hearing examiner may properly award retroactive temporary total disability benefits if the claimant prevails on the merits. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Gerdes, 951 P.2d 1170,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1997).

Purpose of awarding temporary total disability benefits

is to provide income for an injured employee while he or she recovers. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Ohnstad, 802 P.2d 865,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1990).

The provisions dealing with temporary total disability benefits, when read together, indicate that the legislature intended for workers who are temporarily injured to be compensated until their earning power is substantially restored. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Ohnstad, 802 P.2d 865,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1990).

Compensable injury required. —

This section does not require that the temporary disability come about as a result of the first compensable injury, or the original compensable injury, but simply that the temporary disability be caused by a compensable injury. This section in no way limits the award of temporary total disability benefits for a second compensable injury to a certain period of time following the first or original compensable injury. Casper Oil Co. v. Evenson, 888 P.2d 221,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1995).

Increase of incapacity due solely to injury. —

Under §§ 27-14-404(b) and 27-14-605(a), a claimant who had previously accepted a permanent partial impairment award was entitled to additional benefits following surgery if she could prove that she suffered an increase of incapacity due solely to her injury; however, this did not mean that she had to prove she suffered an increase in permanent incapacity, and a showing of a temporary increase was sufficient. Hernandez v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. 1, Hernandez v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. 1 (In re Hernandez), 8 P.3d 318,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 2000).

Medical Commission's finding that the employee did not meet his burden of proving that he was entitled to additional temporary total disability benefits under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 27-14-605(a) and 27-14-404(b) was contrary to the overwhelming weight of the evidence; the employee suffered an increase in incapacity due solely to his work related injury.
In re Worker's Comp. Claim of Glaze v. State Ex Rel. Wyo. Workers'
Safety & Comp. Div., 2009 WY 102, 214 P.3d 228,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Aug. 19, 2009).

When temporary disability deemed total. —

If a claimant is unable to perform remunerative work with reasonable consistency, without pain and discomfort, temporary disability is deemed total. Pacific Power & Light v. Parsons, 692 P.2d 226,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 356

(Wyo. 1984).

Retroactive award of temporary total disability benefits affirmed

where the record contained sufficient evidence to support the conclusion that claimant was unable to work with reasonable consistency without pain and discomfort. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Gerdes, 951 P.2d 1170,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1997).

Worker may do some work and earn some money without disqualification. —

Doing some work and earning some money during a period of temporary total disability does not automatically disqualify a worker from receiving disability benefits. Pacific Power & Light v. Parsons, 692 P.2d 226,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 356

(Wyo. 1984).

Hearing after termination of benefits constitutional. —

Notwithstanding the question of whether or not worker's interest in temporary total disability benefits is a property right, former § 27-12-602 (see now §

27-14-602

) clearly states that a hearing is available. Procedural due process of law is provided if, upon a hearing after termination of temporary total benefits, retroactive relief may be awarded the worker. Higgins v. State, 739 P.2d 129,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 466

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 484 U.S. 988, 108 S. Ct. 508, 98 L. Ed. 2d 507, 1987 U.S. LEXIS 5149 (U.S. 1987).

Prospective benefit awards not authorized. —

This Act does not authorize the hearing examiner's award of claims which accrue after the hearing date, because the hearing examiner is limited to the issues which exist at the time of the hearing. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Gerdes, 951 P.2d 1170,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1997).

Employee who received lump sum permanent partial disability award

and later became temporarily and totally disabled after rod removal surgery sustained an increase of incapacity and was therefore entitled to additional benefits, regardless of whether his permanent partial disability had increased. Parnell v. State, 735 P.2d 1367,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 428

(Wyo. 1987).

Determination of permanent effect of original disability. —

A workers' compensation claimant's first application for permanent benefits, after the claimant had received total temporary benefits, was a new claim for benefits that did not entail an increase or decrease in disability, but a determination as to the permanent effect of the original disability. Tenorio v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div., 931 P.2d 234,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1997), reh'g denied,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. Feb. 4, 1997).

Requirements for termination of benefits. —

The statute does not require actual employment, only that the earning power is substantially restored. Shassetz v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 920 P.2d 1246,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1996).

Benefits cease when stability or recovery reached. —

If a physician does not certify that a workman is totally disabled or when it is indicated that he has reached the point of stability or recovery, temporary total disability benefits must cease. Higgins v. State, 739 P.2d 129,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 466

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 484 U.S. 988, 108 S. Ct. 508, 98 L. Ed. 2d 507, 1987 U.S. LEXIS 5149 (U.S. 1987).

Benefits under former § 27-14-404(b) (now subsection (d) of this section) terminate only when the worker recovers, because only then does he regain his earning power. Incarceration does not restore a disabled worker's earning power. In re Injury to Spera, 713 P.2d 1155,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 470

(Wyo. 1986).

Employee had an ascertainable loss where he had a poor prognosis and could not safely return to a physically demanding position, and he had reached maximum medical improvement unless he was willing to consider fusion surgery.
Phillips v. TIC-The Industrial Co. of Wyoming, Inc. (In re Phillips), 2005 WY 40, 109 P.3d 520,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 2005).

Maximum duration of benefits.

Employee was not entitled to temporary total disability benefits
after the 36-month period provided in
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-404(a) (2011) and Wyo. Rules, Regulations and Fee Schedules
of the Wyoming Workers' Safety and Compensation Division, ch. 7, §
2(b)(i) and (ii) because (1)
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-404(a) allowed such benefits for a maximum of 24 months, (2)
Wyo. Rules, Regulations and Fee Schedules of the Wyoming Workers'
Safety and Compensation Division, ch. 7, § 2(b)(i) and (ii) extended
this period for a maximum of 12 months, and (3) the second injury
rule did not apply to extend the period further, as the plain language
of the statute and Rules applied the 36-month limitation to all “injuries”
resulting from any one incident or accident, encompassing situations
in which an employee received multiple injuries simultaneously or
a subsequent compensable injury as the result of a single workplace
accident.
State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. v. Smith, 2013 WY 26, 296 P.3d 939,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 2013).

Receipt of temporary total disability benefits is limited to a
maximum period of 36 months, which includes 24 months authorized under
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-404(a) and an additional 12 months allowed in extraordinary
circumstances pursuant to rules of the Wyoming Workers' Safety and
Compensation Division because, under the plain language of the statute,
this limitation applied to all “injuries” resulting from any one incident
or accident, encompassing situations in which a claimant received
multiple injuries simultaneously or a subsequent compensable injury
as the result of a single workplace accident.
State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. v. Smith, 2013 WY 26, 296 P.3d 939,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 2013).

In determining when eligibility for benefits ceases, nonmedical factors may be considered

during the healing period. Once the healing period has ended, however, nonmedical factors become relevant only in determining the extent of the employee's permanent disability. State ex rel. Wyoming Worker's Compensation Div. v. Taylor, 737 P.2d 1063,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 460

(Wyo. 1987).

Claimant conducting own business not totally disabled. —

Substantial evidence supported the hearing examiner's conclusion that the claimant's earning power had been substantially restored and that the claimant was not temporarily and totally disabled. The claimant was conducting his own welding business and had distributed business cards in order to solicit business. Although he testified that he was still experiencing pain and that he had not yet been released for work by his physician, he had no apparent difficulty moving or engaging in the various work activities associated with the welding profession. Sims v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div., 872 P.2d 555,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1994).

Computation of hourly wage earner's monthly rate of pay. —

A method of computing an hourly wage earner's monthly rate of pay is to multiply the hourly rate by the hours worked in a week, times the 52 weeks in the year and divide by 12 months. This formula may be used so long as the resulting figure fairly represents the parties' understanding. Hasser v. Flint Eng'g, 647 P.2d 66,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 351

(Wyo. 1982).

Erroneous allowance as to temporary and permanent disability. —

Allowance for temporary total disability and for permanent total disability, treating claimant's disability as temporary up to time of allowance for permanent total disability is erroneous, where disability was permanent from beginning. Marsh v. Aljoe, 41 Wyo. 220, 284 P. 260,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1930).

Not erroneous not to tender disability payments in gold and silver. —

Tendering to a claimant 2/3 of the amount he had received as salary in the form of federal reserve notes, and not in gold and silver, was not an erroneous tender, it not being alleged that the payment of the claimant's salary had been tendered and received in gold and silver. Skurdal v. State, 708 P.2d 1241,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 601

(Wyo. 1985).

Burden of proof. —

Where hearing examiner determined that injured worker's temporary total disability benefits should be terminated, injured worker had burden of demonstrating that his earning power had not been substantially restored and for that reason he was entitled to a continuation of temporary total benefits. Shassetz v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 920 P.2d 1246,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1996).

Wyoming Medical Commission's determination that the employee did not meet his burden of proving he was entitled to further TTD benefits, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

27-14-404

, was supported by substantial evidence, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 16-3-114(c), Wyo. R. App. P. 12.09; the independent medical examination report was properly admitted and the finding that the employee lacked credibility was not contrary to the overwhelming weight of the evidence, and the employee's doctor's opinions were inconsistent with the medical evidence.
In re Worker's Comp. Claim v. State Ex Rel. Wyo. Med. Comm'n & Wyo. Workers'
Safety & Comp. Div., 2011 WY 49, 250 P.3d 1082,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Mar. 21, 2011).

Carpet cleaner awarded benefits for time he worked as counselor. —

Carpet cleaner was entitled to receive temporary total disability benefits for the period he worked as a counselor, where he had earned approximately $1,200 per month before he was injured and four dollars per hour while he was working as a counselor. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Ohnstad, 802 P.2d 865,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1990).

Application for reinstatement of benefits not untimely. —

Trial court erred in upholding the denial of TTD benefits to an employee because pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-404(d), the employee was entitled to apply for reinstatement of TDD benefits under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

27-14-605

as the payment of benefits had ceased for a period of eight days or more; a physician's order that the employee was not to work was evidence of increased incapacity within the meaning of §

27-14-605

.Boe v. State Ex Rel. Wyo. Workers'
Safety & Comp. Div., 2009 WY 115, 216 P.3d 494,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Sept. 17, 2009).

Extended benefits. —

Workers'
compensation claimant was properly denied extended temporary total disability (TTD) benefits under this section because the fact that a claimant's benefits were disputed or the subject of a contested case was not a circumstance the Wyoming Workers'
Compensation Division had established as a basis for extended TTD benefits.
Dorman v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2012 WY 94, 281 P.3d 342,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2012).

Wyoming Worker's
Safety and Compensation Division exceeded its statutory authority
by adopting a rule limiting additional temporary total disability
benefits to twelve months because, pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

27-14-404

, the Division was authorized, but not required, to award
temporary total disability benefits beyond the statutory maximum.
State ex rel. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs. v. Clements, 2014 WY 68, 326 P.3d 177,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 2014).

Doctor's form. —

Office of Administrative Hearing (OAH) properly denied claim for temporary total disability (TTD) benefits, where “Return to Work/School” document did not include a certification that the employee was temporarily totally disabled under Wyoming law or set forth the reasons for the disability or expected period of disability as required by the Wyoming Workers'
Safety and Compensation Division Rule and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 27-14-404(d) and 501(b); moreover, the doctor's form did not provide detailed information about the health care provider or the employee's diagnosis, treatment plan, or prognosis.
Bailey v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2010 WY 152, 243 P.3d 953,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 2010).

Reduction of benefits proper. —

Trial court erred in overturning a decision reducing an employee's TTD benefits under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-404(j) on the ground that the employee refused an offer of light duty work because the employee acknowledged that, on the surface, the light duty job offer appeared to be bona fide in that it took into consideration every physical limitation the employee had and accommodated those limitations.
State Ex Rel. Wyo. Workers'
Safety & Comp. Div. v. Cave, 2011 WY 133, 261 P.3d 724,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Sept. 20, 2011).

Quoted

in

Carson v. Wyoming State Penitentiary, 735 P.2d 424,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 419

(Wyo. 1987); Cordova v. Holly Sugar Corp., 882 P.2d 880,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 1994); Snyder v. State, 957 P.2d 289,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 1998); Kebschull v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2017 WY 94, 399 P.3d 1249,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 2017).

Cited

in

Smith v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 965 P.2d 687,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1998), overruled on other grounds, Slater v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2001 WY 29, 18 P.3d 1195,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2001);
Moller v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 12 P.3d 702,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 211

(Wyo. 2000);
State ex rel. Workers' Safety & Compensation Div. v. Gerrard, 2001 WY 7, 17 P.3d 20,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2001);
McIntosh v. Wyo. Medical Comm'n, 2007 WY 108, 162 P.3d 483,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(July 12, 2007);
Nagle v. State ex rel. Wyo. Worker's Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Worker's Comp. Claim of Nagle), 2008 WY 99, 190 P.3d 159,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Aug. 19, 2008); Stallman v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Stallman), 2012 WY 147,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Nov 20, 2012).

Library References.

Larson's Workers' Compensation Law § 157.02D (Matthew Bender).